District of Columbia statutes.
32-733

Regulations.

The Commissioner may issue rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-149, § 4, 49 DCR 4233

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Continuation of Health Coverage Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-108, April 13, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 4056).